hr-HR: Vrsta profila gonga: Ispupčeni (nipple); Duboko udubljeni; Ravni (bez ispupčenja); Blago uzdignuto središte; Ostalo
da: Profiltype for gong: Med knop (nippel); Dyb skål; Flad (uden knop); Let forhøjet midte; Anden
ja: ゴングプロファイルタイプ: ボス付き (ニップル); ディープディッシュ; フラット (ボスなし); 中央微隆起; その他
ru: Тип профиля гонга: С выпуклостью (с куполом); Глубокие (чашеобразные); Плоские (без выпуклости); Слегка приподнятый центр; Другое
ko: 공 프로필 유형: 보스형(니플); 오목형; 평면형(보스 없음); 중앙이 약간 솟은 형태; 기타
nl: Gong profieltype: Met bult (tepel); Diep schotelvormig; Plat (geen bult); Licht verhoogd midden; Anders
sv: Gong-profiltyp: Kuppel; Djup; Platt (utan upphöjning); Något upphöjd mitt; Annan
el: Τύπος προφίλ Γκονγκ: Με προεξοχή (nipple); Βαθύ; Επίπεδο (χωρίς προεξοχή); Ελαφρώς υπερυψωμένο κέντρο; Άλλο
zh-CN: 锣型轮廓类型: 中心带凸起; 深盘形; 平面（无凸起）; 中心微凸; 其他
it: Tipo di profilo del gong: Con bugna (nipple); A piatto profondo; Piatto (senza bugna); Centro leggermente rialzato; Altro
vi: Loại hình cồng chiêng: Có núm (bossed); Dạng đĩa sâu; Phẳng (không núm); Trung tâm hơi nhô lên; Khác
fi: Gongin profiilin tyyppi: Kuvullinen; Syvä; Litteä (ei kupua); Hieman korotettu keskiosa; Muu
sk-SK: Typ profilu gongu: S pupkom (nipple); Hlboký; Plochý (bez pupka); Mierne vyvýšený stred; Iné
sl-SI: Vrsta profila gonga: Izklenjen (z izboklino); Z globokim robom; Ravno (brez izbokline); Rahlo dvignjena sredina; Drugo
zh-TW: 鑼體輪廓類型: 凸臍 (乳突); 深盤; 扁平 (無凸臍); 中心微凸; 其他
hu: Gong profil típusa: Kúpos (bimbós); Mélyített; Lapos (kúp nélküli); Enyhén emelt közepű; Egyéb
bg-BG: Тип профил на гонга: Изпъкнал център (Bossed/nipple); С дълбок борд (Deep-dished); Плосък (без изпъкнал център); Леко повдигнат център; Друго
en: Gong profile type: Bossed (nipple); Deep-dished; Flat (no boss); Slightly raised center; Other
ro-RO: Tipul de profil Gong: Cu protuberanță (mamelon); Adâncit; Plat (fără protuberanță); Centru ușor ridicat; Altele
tr: Gong profil tipi: Tümsek (meme); Derin çukur; Düz (tümsek yok); Hafif yükseltilmiş merkez; Diğer
pt-PT: Tipo de perfil de gongo: Com saliência (mamilo); Profundo; Plano (sem saliência); Centro ligeiramente elevado; Outro
fr: Type de profil du gong: Avec bosse (mamelon); Profond; Plat (sans bosse); Centre légèrement surélevé; Autre
lt-LT: Gongo profilio tipas: Su iškilimu centre; Gilus įgaubtas; Plokščias (be iškilimo); Šiek tiek iškilęs centras; Kita
th: ประเภทรูปทรงของฆ้อง: มีปุ่มนูน (ทรงเต้านม); ขอบลึก; แบนเรียบ (ไม่มีปุ่มนูน); ตรงกลางนูนขึ้นเล็กน้อย; อื่นๆ
pl: Typ profilu gongu: Z guzem (nipple); Głęboki profil; Płaski (bez guza); Lekko uniesiony środek; Inny
cs: Typ profilu gongu: S výstupkem; Hluboké; Plochý (bez výstupku); Mírně vyvýšený střed; Ostatní
es: Tipo de perfil Gong: Con campana (pezón); Plato profundo; Plano (sin campana); Centro ligeramente elevado; Otro
pt-BR: Gongo tipo de perfil: Com saliência (mamilo); Côncavo profundo; Plano (sem saliência); Centro levemente elevado; Outro
nb: Gong-profiltype: Med kuppel (nipple); Dyp skålform; Flat (uten kuppel); Lett forhøyet senter; Annet
de: Typ des Gongprofils: Gebuckelt (mit Kuppe); Tiefer Rand; Flach (ohne Buckel); Leicht erhöhte Mitte; Andere